Utah statutes.
76-3-104.   Misdemeanors classified.
(1) Misdemeanors are classified into three categories:
(a)  Class A misdemeanors;
(b)  Class B misdemeanors;
(c)  Class C misdemeanors.
(2)  An offense designated a misdemeanor, either in this code or in another
law, without specification as to punishment or category, is a class B
misdemeanor.
